Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201677-3102
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Volunteer Emergency Responders Incentive Act:

(1) Active emergency responder means a person who has been approved by the duly constituted authority in control of a volunteer department as a volunteer member of the department, who is performing services, as both a firefighter and on a rescue squad, in the protection of life, health, or property from fire or other emergency, accident, illness, or calamity in connection with which the services of such volunteer department are required, and whose services and activities during a year of service meet the minimum requirements for qualification as an active member of his or her volunteer department as established by section 77-3103;

(2) Active rescue squad member means a person who has been approved by the duly constituted authority in control of a volunteer department as a volunteer member of the department, who is performing services as part of a rescue squad in the protection of life or health from emergency, accident, illness, or calamity in connection with which the services of such volunteer department are required, and whose services and activities during a year of service meet the minimum requirements for qualification as an active member of his or her volunteer department as established by section 77-3103;

(3) Active volunteer firefighter means a person who has been approved by the duly constituted authority in control of a volunteer department as a volunteer member of the department, who is performing services as a firefighter in the protection of life or property from fire or other emergency, accident, or calamity in connection with which the services of such volunteer department are required, and whose services and activities during a year of service meet the minimum requirements for qualification as an active member of his or her volunteer department as established by section 77-3103;

(4) Standard criteria for qualified active service means the minimum annual service requirements for the qualification of a volunteer member of a volunteer department as an active emergency responder, active rescue squad member, or active volunteer firefighter so as to allow such person a refundable credit to be applied against his or her income tax liability; and

(5) Volunteer department means any volunteer fire department, any volunteer first-aid, rescue, ambulance, or emergency squad, or any volunteer fire company, association, or organization serving any city, village, or rural or suburban fire protection district by providing fire protection or emergency response services for the purpose of protecting human life, health, or property.

Laws 2016, LB886, § 2.
July 21, 2016